Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2020, Fifth Special Session chapter 3, article 1, section 17, subdivision 13, as amended by Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 3, section 23, is amended to read: Subd. 13. White Bear Lake Communities; Lake Links Trail 3,600,000 new text begin (a) new text end For grants to complete design and construction of a multiuse paved trail and route for pedestrians, bicycles, and wheelchairs around White Bear Lake in Ramsey and Washington Counties, as follows: (1) $2,600,000 of this appropriation is for deleted text begin a grantdeleted text end new text begin one or more grantsnew text end to the city of Dellwood in Washington County to design, engineer, construct, and equip trail improvements consistent with the completed preliminary engineering along or parallel with the shore of White Bear Lake between the Mahtomedi city limits and the western line of Washington County. This appropriation may also be used for the acquisition of permanent easements and right-of-way; (2) $500,000 of this appropriation is for a grant to White Bear Township in Ramsey County to design, engineer, construct, and equip trail improvements along and parallel with the shore of White Bear Lake between the Washington County line and the city limits of the city of White Bear Lake, Ramsey County; and (3) $500,000 of this appropriation is for a grant to the city of White Bear Lake in Ramsey County to design, engineer, construct, and equip trail improvements along or parallel with the shore of White Bear Lake between the eastern city limits of White Bear Lake and Pacific Avenue. new text begin (b) The city of Dellwood may complete the trail improvements funded under paragraph (a), clause (1), in the following segments and in any order, and may enter into separate grant agreements for each trail segment or any combination of segments: new text end new text begin (1) Echo Street to Dwinnell Avenue, along the railway bed; new text end new text begin (2) Yellow Birch Road to Echo Street, along Dellwood Avenue; new text end new text begin (3) Meadow Lane to Yellow Birch Road, along Dellwood Avenue; and new text end new text begin (4) from the intersection of Dellwood Road and Dellwood Avenue to the intersection of Meadow Lane and Dellwood Avenue, along Dellwood Avenue. new text end new text begin Amounts remaining after substantial completion of a trail segment or combination of segments under this paragraph may be applied to any other trail segment or combination of segments described in this paragraph. new text end new text begin (c) new text end Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the bond sale authorization and appropriation of bond proceeds for this project is available until December 31, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 11, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Dellwood; Lake Links Trail 2,000,000 For deleted text begin a grantdeleted text end new text begin one or more grantsnew text end to the city of Dellwood in Washington County to design, engineer, construct, and equip trail improvements consistent with the completed preliminary engineering along or parallel with the shore of White Bear Lake between the Mahtomedi city limits and the western border of Washington County. This appropriation may also be used for the acquisition of permanent easements and right-of-way. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2020, Fifth Special Session chapter 3, article 1, section 17, subdivision 13, for the same purposes.new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the appropriation for this project is available until December 31, 2028.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end